Washington statutes.
RCW 39.86.190

Biennial reports.

Beginning in June 2018 and thereafter by June 30th of each even-numbered year, the agency shall submit a biennial report to the legislature summarizing usage of the bond allocation proceeds and any policy concerns for future bond allocations.

[ 2016 sp.s. c 18 s 3; 2010 1st sp.s. c 6 s 11; 2009 c 518 s 19; 1987 c 297 s 10.]

NOTES:

Short title—2010 1st sp.s. c 6: See note following RCW 43.180.160.